Hawaii statutes.
[§472-2] Practice of veterinary technology;
qualifications; registration required. (a) No person shall represent, announce,
or advertise oneself, publicly or privately, as a veterinary technician or
registered veterinary technician, or shall append the letters "RVT" or
"VT" or affix any other words, letters, abbreviations, or insignia to
the person's name indicating or implying that the person is engaged in the
practice of veterinary technology, unless the person:

(1) Registers the person's name and business address
biennially with the department in a manner prescribed by the department; and

(2) Meets the qualifications of section 472-3.

(b) The department shall maintain and
biennially update a list of the names and business addresses of the veterinary
technicians who are registered pursuant to subsection (a).

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed
to prohibit a licensed veterinarian from utilizing support or auxiliary
personnel to assist in the practice of veterinary medicine; provided that the
support or auxiliary personnel shall work under the direct supervision of a
licensed veterinarian.

(d) A registration granted under this chapter
shall mean that the person has met the requirements, including minimum practice
standards, to provide protection to the public and is permitted to use the
title of veterinary technician or registered veterinary technician and engage
in the practice of veterinary technology. [L 2016, c 147, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next